Maine, session 132, LD49.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §1717, sub-§2-B, ¶B, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 309, §6, is
amended to read:
B. Quality measures performance metrics established in accordance with subsection
2-F;
Sec. 2. 22 MRSA §1717, sub-§2-F is enacted to read:
2-F. Quality performance metrics for personal care agencies. The department shall
establish by rule and post on a publicly accessible website annual quality performance
metrics for personal care agencies. The department may revoke the license of a personal
care agency that fails to timely or adequately satisfy the quality performance metrics
established by the department or file reports required by the department. To determine if
a personal care agency meets the quality performance metrics established by the
department, the department may collect data relating to the personal care agency, including,
but not limited to, claims data, performance data and survey data. Rules adopted pursuant
to this subsection are routine technical rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter
2-A.